Florida, session 2026, HB433.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
275
Page 11 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
276 Section 1. Section 125.489, Florida Statutes, is created
277 to read:
278 125.489 Preemption of restrictions on gasoline-powered
279 farm equipment or gasoline-powered landscape equipment.—
280 (1) As used in this section, the term:
281 (a) "Gasoline-powered farm equipment" means any machine
282 powered by an internal combustion engine or motor that uses
283 gasoline, diesel, or a blend of gasoline and oil which is used
284 on a farm or used to transport farm products.
285 (b) "Gasoline-powered landscape equipment" means any
286 machine powered by an internal combustion engine or motor that
287 uses gasoline, diesel, or a blend of gasoline and oil which is
288 used to provide landscape management or maintenance or to move
289 leaves, dirt, grass, or other debris off of sidewalks,
290 driveways, lawns, or other surfaces.
291 (2) A county may not enact or enforce a resolution, an
292 ordinance, a rule, a code, or a policy or take any action that
293 restricts or prohibits the use of gasoline-powered farm
294 equipment or gasoline-powered landscape equipment and may not
295 create differing standards for such equipment or distinguish
296 such equipment from any electric or similar equipment in a
297 retail, manufacturer, or distributor setting.
298 (3) This section does not prohibit or limit a county from
299 encouraging the use of alternative farm or landscape equipment,
300 such as battery-powered farm or landscape equipment.
Page 12 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
301 Section 2. Present subsections (18) through (30) and (31)
302 through (54) of section 163.3164, Florida Statutes, are
303 redesignated as subsections (19) through (31) and (33) through
304 (56), respectively, and new subsections (18) and (32) are added
305 to that section, to read:
306 163.3164 Community Planning Act; definitions.—As used in
307 this act:
308 (18) "Ecologically significant parcel" means a parcel of
309 land located within the boundaries of a low-density municipality
310 which is currently undeveloped and has been designated as either
311 rural, conservation, agricultural, or greenspace as provided by
312 a local government comprehensive plan developed pursuant to s.
313 163.3177.
314 (32) "Low-density municipality" means a municipality
315 existing on or before January 1, 2025, which is less than 2,500
316 acres in total size and contains a population of 5,000 or fewer
317 legal residents.
318 Section 3. Present subsection (7) of section 163.3202,
319 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (8), and a new
320 subsection (7) is added to that section, to read:
321 163.3202 Land development regulations.—
322 (7)(a) Notwithstanding any ordinance to the contrary, an
323 application for a development on an ecologically significant
324 parcel in a low-density municipality may not be administratively
325 approved without an attestation provided by the developer, under
Page 13 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
326 penalty of perjury, to the low-density municipality which states
327 that the development will not exceed a maximum density of 1
328 residential unit per 20 acres.
329 (b) This subsection does not apply to applications for the
330 construction of residential units on an ecologically significant
331 parcel for the express purpose of providing housing for family
332 members of the applicant. However, the applicant must provide an
333 attestation, under penalty of perjury, to the low-density
334 municipality which states that the residential units being
335 constructed will be used for such express purpose before the
336 administrative approval of an application for development.
337 (c) The density requirements provided in this subsection
338 may be waived upon a resolution approved by a unanimous vote of
339 the commission or council of the low-density municipality.
340 Section 4. Section 166.063, Florida Statutes, is created
341 to read:
342 166.063 Preemption of restrictions on gasoline-powered
343 farm equipment or gasoline-powered landscape equipment.—
344 (1) As used in this section, the term:
345 (a) "Gasoline-powered farm equipment" means a machine
346 powered by an internal combustion engine or motor that uses
347 gasoline, diesel, or a blend of gasoline and oil which is used
348 on a farm or used to transport farm products.
349 (b) "Gasoline-powered landscape equipment" means any
350 machine powered by an internal combustion engine or motor that
Page 14 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
351 uses gasoline, diesel, or a blend of gasoline and oil which is
352 used to provide landscape management or maintenance or to move
353 leaves, dirt, grass, or other debris off of sidewalks,
354 driveways, lawns, or other surfaces.
355 (2) A municipality may not enact or enforce a resolution,
356 an ordinance, a rule, a code, or a policy or take any action
357 that restricts or prohibits the use of gasoline-powered farm
358 equipment or gasoline-powered landscape equipment and may not
359 create differing standards for such equipment or distinguish
360 such equipment from any electric or similar equipment in a
361 retail, manufacturer, or distributor setting.
362 (3) This section does not prohibit or limit a municipality
363 from encouraging the use of alternative farm or landscape
364 equipment, such as battery-powered farm or landscape equipment.
365 Section 5. Paragraph (d) of subsection (2) of section
366 212.055, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
367 212.055 Discretionary sales surtaxes; legislative intent;
368 authorization and use of proceeds.—It is the legislative intent
369 that any authorization for imposition of a discretionary sales
370 surtax shall be published in the Florida Statutes as a
371 subsection of this section, irrespective of the duration of the
372 levy. Each enactment shall specify the types of counties
373 authorized to levy; the rate or rates which may be imposed; the
374 maximum length of time the surtax may be imposed, if any; the
375 procedure which must be followed to secure voter approval, if
Page 15 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
376 required; the purpose for which the proceeds may be expended;
377 and such other requirements as the Legislature may provide.
378 Taxable transactions and administrative procedures shall be as
379 provided in s. 212.054.
380 (2) LOCAL GOVERNMENT INFRASTRUCTURE SURTAX.—
381 (d) The proceeds of the surtax authorized by this
382 subsection and any accrued interest shall be expended by the
383 school district, within the county and municipalities within the
384 county, or, in the case of a negotiated joint county agreement,
385 within another county, to finance, plan, and construct
386 infrastructure; to acquire any interest in land for public
387 recreation, conservation, or protection of natural resources or
388 to prevent or satisfy private property rights claims resulting
389 from limitations imposed by the designation of an area of
390 critical state concern; to provide loans, grants, or rebates to
391 residential or commercial property owners who make energy
392 efficiency improvements to their residential or commercial
393 property, if a local government ordinance authorizing such use
394 is approved by referendum; or to finance the closure of county-
395 owned or municipally owned solid waste landfills that have been
396 closed or are required to be closed by order of the Department
397 of Environmental Protection. Any use of the proceeds or interest
398 for purposes of landfill closure before July 1, 1993, is
399 ratified. The proceeds and any interest may not be used for the
400 operational expenses of infrastructure, except that a county
Page 16 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
401 that has a population of fewer than 75,000 and that is required
402 to close a landfill may use the proceeds or interest for long-
403 term maintenance costs associated with landfill closure.
404 Counties, as defined in s. 125.011, and charter counties may, in
405 addition, use the proceeds or interest to retire or service
406 indebtedness incurred for bonds issued before July 1, 1987, for
407 infrastructure purposes, and for bonds subsequently issued to
408 refund such bonds. Any use of the proceeds or interest for
409 purposes of retiring or servicing indebtedness incurred for
410 refunding bonds before July 1, 1999, is ratified.
411 1. For the purposes of this paragraph, the term
412 "infrastructure" means:
413 a. Any fixed capital expenditure or fixed capital outlay
414 associated with the construction, reconstruction, or improvement
415 of public facilities that have a life expectancy of 5 or more
416 years, any related land acquisition, land improvement, design,
417 and engineering costs, and all other professional and related
418 costs required to bring the public facilities into service. For
419 purposes of this sub-subparagraph, the term "public facilities"
420 has the same meaning means facilities as defined in s.
421 163.3164(43) s. 163.3164(41), s. 163.3221(13), or s. 189.012(5),
422 and includes facilities that are necessary to carry out
423 governmental purposes, including, but not limited to, fire
424 stations, general governmental office buildings, and animal
425 shelters, regardless of whether the facilities are owned by the
Page 17 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
426 local taxing authority or another governmental entity.
427 b. A fire department vehicle, an emergency medical service
428 vehicle, a sheriff's office vehicle, a police department
429 vehicle, or any other vehicle, and the equipment necessary to
430 outfit the vehicle for its official use or equipment that has a
431 life expectancy of at least 5 years.
432 c. Any expenditure for the construction, lease, or
433 maintenance of, or provision of utilities or security for,
434 facilities, as defined in s. 29.008.
435 d. Any fixed capital expenditure or fixed capital outlay
436 associated with the improvement of private facilities that have
437 a life expectancy of 5 or more years and that the owner agrees
438 to make available for use on a temporary basis as needed by a
439 local government as a public emergency shelter or a staging area
440 for emergency response equipment during an emergency officially
441 declared by the state or by the local government under s.
442 252.38. Such improvements are limited to those necessary to
443 comply with current standards for public emergency evacuation
444 shelters. The owner must enter into a written contract with the
445 local government providing the improvement funding to make the
446 private facility available to the public for purposes of
447 emergency shelter at no cost to the local government for a
448 minimum of 10 years after completion of the improvement, with
449 the provision that the obligation will transfer to any
450 subsequent owner until the end of the minimum period.
Page 18 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
451 e. Any land acquisition expenditure for a residential
452 housing project in which at least 30 percent of the units are
453 affordable to individuals or families whose total annual
454 household income does not exceed 120 percent of the area median
455 income adjusted for household size, if the land is owned by a
456 local government or by a special district that enters into a
457 written agreement with the local government to provide such
458 housing. The local government or special district may enter into
459 a ground lease with a public or private person or entity for
460 nominal or other consideration for the construction of the
461 residential housing project on land acquired pursuant to this
462 sub-subparagraph.
463 f. Instructional technology used solely in a school
464 district's classrooms. As used in this sub-subparagraph, the
465 term "instructional technology" means an interactive device that
466 assists a teacher in instructing a class or a group of students
467 and includes the necessary hardware and software to operate the
468 interactive device. The term also includes support systems in
469 which an interactive device may mount and is not required to be
470 affixed to the facilities.
471 2. For the purposes of this paragraph, the term "energy
472 efficiency improvement" means any energy conservation and
473 efficiency improvement that reduces consumption through
474 conservation or a more efficient use of electricity, natural
475 gas, propane, or other forms of energy on the property,
Page 19 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
476 including, but not limited to, air sealing; installation of
477 insulation; installation of energy-efficient heating, cooling,
478 or ventilation systems; installation of solar panels; building
479 modifications to increase the use of daylight or shade;
480 replacement of windows; installation of energy controls or
481 energy recovery systems; installation of electric vehicle
482 charging equipment; installation of systems for natural gas fuel
483 as defined in s. 206.9951; and installation of efficient
484 lighting equipment.
485 3. Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection,
486 a local government infrastructure surtax imposed or extended
487 after July 1, 1998, may allocate up to 15 percent of the surtax
488 proceeds for deposit into a trust fund within the county's
489 accounts created for the purpose of funding economic development
490 projects having a general public purpose of improving local
491 economies, including the funding of operational costs and
492 incentives related to economic development. The ballot statement
493 must indicate the intention to make an allocation under the
494 authority of this subparagraph.
495 4. Surtax revenues that are shared with eligible charter
496 schools pursuant to paragraph (c) shall be allocated among such
497 schools based on each school's proportionate share of total
498 school district capital outlay full-time equivalent enrollment
499 as adopted by the education estimating conference established in
500 s. 216.136. Surtax revenues must be expended by the charter
Page 20 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
501 school in a manner consistent with the allowable uses provided
502 in s. 1013.62(4). All revenues and expenditures shall be
503 accounted for in a charter school's monthly or quarterly
504 financial statement pursuant to s. 1002.33(9). If a school's
505 charter is not renewed or is terminated and the school is
506 dissolved under the provisions of law under which the school was
507 organized, any unencumbered funds received under this paragraph
508 shall revert to the sponsor.
509 Section 6. Present subsection (19) of section 253.0341,
510 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (21), and new
511 subsection (19) and subsection (20) are added to that section,
512 to read:
513 253.0341 Surplus of state-owned lands.—
514 (19) The Acquisition and Restoration Council shall
515 determine whether any lands surplused by a local governmental
516 entity, as defined in s. 218.72, on or after January 1, 2024,
517 are suitable for bona fide agricultural purposes, as defined in
518 s. 193.461(3)(b). A local governmental entity may not transfer
519 future development rights for any surplused lands determined to
520 be suitable for bona fide agricultural purposes on or after
521 January 1, 2024.
522 (20) The Department of Environmental Protection, in
523 coordination with the Department of Agriculture and Consumer
524 Services, shall determine whether any state-owned conservation
525 lands acquired on or after January 1, 2024, are suitable for
Page 21 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
526 bona fide agricultural purposes, as defined in s. 193.461(3)(b).
527 (a) Notwithstanding any other law or rule, the Department
528 of Environmental Protection may surplus state-owned conservation
529 lands acquired on or after January 1, 2024, determined to be
530 suitable for bona fide agricultural purposes.
531 (b) For all state-owned conservation lands determined to
532 be suitable for bona fide agricultural production and surplused
533 by the Department of Environmental Protection, the department
534 shall retain a rural-lands-protection easement pursuant to s.
535 570.71(3). All proceeds from the sale of such surplused lands
536 must be deposited into the Incidental Trust Fund within the
537 Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services for less than
538 fee simple land acquisition pursuant to ss. 570.71 and 570.715.
539 (c) By January 1, 2027, and each January 1 thereafter, the
540 Department of Environmental Protection shall provide a report of
541 state-owned conservation lands surplused pursuant to this
542 subsection to the Board of Trustees of the Internal Improvement
543 Trust Fund.
544 (d) Designated state forest lands, state park lands,
545 wildlife management areas, or lands within the boundaries of the
546 federally authorized and approved Comprehensive Everglades
547 Restoration Plan may not be surplused pursuant to this
548 subsection.
549 Section 7. Section 259.1053, Florida Statutes, is amended
550 to read:
Page 22 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
551 259.1053 Babcock Ranch Preserve; Babcock Ranch Advisory
552 Group.—
553 (1) SHORT TITLE.—This section may be cited as the "Babcock
554 Ranch Preserve Act."
555 (2) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section, the term:
556 (a) "Babcock Ranch Preserve" and "preserve" mean the lands
557 and facilities acquired in the purchase of the Babcock Crescent
558 B Ranch, as provided in s. 259.1052.
559 (b) "Commission" means the Fish and Wildlife Conservation
560 Commission.
561 (c) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Agriculture.
562 (d) "Department" means the Department of Agriculture and
563 Consumer Services.
564 (e) "Executive director" means the Executive Director of
565 the Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission.
566 (f) "Financially self-sustaining" means having management
567 and operation expenditures not more than the revenues collected
568 from fees and other receipts for resource use and development
569 and from interest and invested funds.
570 (g) "Florida Forest Service" means the Florida Forest
571 Service of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.
572 (h) "Multiple use" means the management of all of the
573 renewable surface resources of the Babcock Ranch Preserve to
574 best meet the needs of the public, including the use of the land
575 for some or all of the renewable surface resources or related
Page 23 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
576 services over areas large enough to allow for periodic
577 adjustments in use to conform to the changing needs and
578 conditions of the preserve while recognizing that a portion of
579 the land will be used for some of the renewable surface
580 resources available on that land. The goal of multiple use is
581 the harmonious and coordinated management of the renewable
582 surface resources without impairing the productivity of the land
583 and considering the relative value of the renewable surface
584 resources, and not necessarily a combination of uses to provide
585 the greatest monetary return or the greatest unit output.
586 (i) "Sustained yield of the renewable surface resources"
587 means the achievement and maintenance of a high level of annual
588 or regular periodic output of the various renewable surface
589 resources of the preserve without impairing the productivity of
590 the land.
591 (3) CREATION OF BABCOCK RANCH PRESERVE.—
592 (a) Upon the date of acquisition of the Babcock Crescent B
593 Ranch, there is created the Babcock Ranch Preserve, which shall
594 be managed in accordance with the purposes and requirements of
595 this section.
596 (b) The preserve is established to protect and preserve
597 the environmental, agricultural, scientific, scenic, geologic,
598 watershed, fish, wildlife, historic, cultural, and recreational
599 values of the preserve, and to provide for the multiple use and
600 sustained yield of the renewable surface resources within the
Page 24 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
601 preserve consistent with this section.
602 (c) This section does not preclude the use of common
603 varieties of mineral materials such as sand, stone, and gravel
604 for construction and maintenance of roads and facilities within
605 the preserve.
606 (d) This section does not affect the constitutional
607 responsibilities of the commission in the exercise of its
608 regulatory and executive power with respect to wild animal life
609 and freshwater aquatic life, including the regulation of
610 hunting, fishing, and trapping within the preserve.
611 (e) This section does not interfere with or prevent the
612 implementation of agricultural practices authorized by the
613 agricultural land use designations established in the local
614 comprehensive plans of either Charlotte County or Lee County as
615 those plans apply to the Babcock Ranch Preserve.
616 (f) This section does not preclude the maintenance and use
617 of roads and trails or the relocation of roads in existence on
618 the effective date of this section, or the construction,
619 maintenance, and use of new trails, or any motorized access
620 necessary for the administration of the land contained within
621 the preserve, including motorized access necessary for
622 emergencies involving the health or safety of persons within the
623 preserve.
624 (4) BABCOCK RANCH ADVISORY GROUP.—
625 (a) The purpose of the Babcock Ranch Advisory Group is to
Page 25 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
626 assist the department by providing guidance and advice
627 concerning the management and stewardship of the Babcock Ranch
628 Preserve.
629 (b) The Babcock Ranch Advisory Group shall be comprised of
630 nine members appointed to 5-year terms. Based on recommendations
631 from the Governor and Cabinet, the commission, and the governing
632 boards of Charlotte County and Lee County, the commissioner
633 shall appoint members as follows:
634 1. One member with experience in sustainable management of
635 forest lands for commodity purposes.
636 2. One member with experience in financial management,
637 budget and program analysis, and small business operations.
638 3. One member with experience in management of game and
639 nongame wildlife and fish populations, including hunting,
640 fishing, and other recreational activities.
641 4. One member with experience in domesticated livestock
642 management, production, and marketing, including range
643 management and livestock business management.
644 5. One member with experience in agriculture operations or
645 forestry management.
646 6. One member with experience in hunting, fishing, nongame
647 species management, or wildlife habitat management, restoration,
648 and conservation.
649 7. One member with experience in public outreach and
650 education.
Page 26 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
651 8. One member who is a resident of Lee County, to be
652 designated by the Board of County Commissioners of Lee County.
653 9. One member who is a resident of Charlotte County, to be
654 designated by the Board of County Commissioners of Charlotte
655 County.
656
657 Vacancies will be filled in the same manner in which the
658 original appointment was made. A member appointed to fill a
659 vacancy shall serve for the remainder of that term.
660 (c) Members of the Babcock Ranch Advisory Group shall:
661 1. Elect a chair and vice chair from among the group
662 members.
663 2. Meet regularly as determined by the chair.
664 3. Serve without compensation but shall receive
665 reimbursement for travel and per diem expenses as provided in s.
666 112.061.
667 (4)(5) MANAGEMENT OF PRESERVE; FEES.—
668 (a) The department shall assume all authority provided by
669 this section to manage and operate the preserve as a working
670 ranch upon the termination or expiration of the management
671 agreement attached as Exhibit "E" to that certain agreement for
672 sale and purchase approved by the Board of Trustees of the
673 Internal Improvement Trust Fund on November 22, 2005, and by Lee
674 County on November 20, 2005.
675 (b) Upon assuming management and operation of the
Page 27 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
676 preserve, the department shall:
677 1. Manage and operate the preserve and the uses thereof,
678 including, but not limited to, the activities necessary to
679 administer and operate the preserve as a working ranch; the
680 activities necessary for the preservation and development of the
681 land and renewable surface resources of the preserve; the
682 activities necessary for interpretation of the history of the
683 preserve on behalf of the public; the activities necessary for
684 the management, public use, and occupancy of facilities and
685 lands within the preserve; and the maintenance, rehabilitation,
686 repair, and improvement of property within the preserve.
687 2. Develop programs and activities relating to the
688 management of the preserve as a working ranch.
689 3. Establish procedures for entering into lease agreements
690 and other agreements for the use and occupancy of the facilities
691 of the preserve. The procedures shall ensure reasonable
692 competition and set guidelines for determining reasonable fees,
693 terms, and conditions for such agreements.
694 4. Assess reasonable fees for admission to, use of, and
695 occupancy of the preserve to offset costs of operating the
696 preserve as a working ranch. These fees are independent of fees
697 assessed by the commission for the privilege of hunting,
698 fishing, or pursuing outdoor recreational activities within the
699 preserve, and shall be deposited into the Incidental Trust Fund
700 of the Florida Forest Service, subject to appropriation by the
Page 28 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
701 Legislature.
702 (c) The commission, in cooperation with the department,
703 shall:
704 1. Establish and implement public hunting and other fish
705 and wildlife management activities. Tier I and Tier II public
706 hunting opportunities shall be provided consistent with the
707 management plan and the recreation master plan. Tier I public
708 hunting shall provide hunting opportunities similar to those
709 offered on wildlife management areas with an emphasis on youth
710 and family-oriented hunts. Tier II public hunting shall be
711 provided specifically by fee-based permitting to ensure
712 compatibility with livestock grazing and other essential
713 agricultural operations on the preserve.
714 2. Establish and administer permit fees for Tier II public
715 hunting to capitalize on the value of hunting on portions of the
716 preserve and to help ensure the preserve is financially self-
717 sufficient. The fees shall be deposited into the State Game
718 Trust Fund of the Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission to
719 be used to offset the costs of providing public hunting and to
720 support fish and wildlife management and other land management
721 activities on the preserve.
722 (d) The Board of Trustees of the Internal Improvement
723 Trust Fund or its designated agent may:
724 1. Negotiate directly with and enter into such agreements,
725 leases, contracts, and other arrangements with any person, firm,
Page 29 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
726 association, organization, corporation, or governmental entity,
727 including entities of federal, state, and local governments, as
728 are necessary and appropriate to carry out the purposes and
729 activities authorized by this section.
730 2. Grant privileges, leases, concessions, and permits for
731 the use of land for the accommodation of visitors to the
732 preserve, provided no natural curiosities or objects of interest
733 shall be granted, leased, or rented on such terms as shall deny
734 or interfere with free access to them by the public. Such
735 grants, leases, and permits may be made and given without
736 advertisement or securing competitive bids. Such grants, leases,
737 or permits may not be assigned or transferred by any grantee
738 without consent of the Board of Trustees of the Internal
739 Improvement Trust Fund or its designated agent.
740 (5)(6) DISSOLUTION OF BABCOCK RANCH, INC.—Upon dissolution
741 of the Babcock Ranch, Inc., all statutory powers, duties,
742 functions, records, personnel, property, and unexpended balances
743 of appropriations, allocations, and other funds of the
744 corporation shall be transferred to the Department of
745 Agriculture and Consumer Services unless otherwise provided by
746 law. Any cash balances of funds shall revert to the Incidental
747 Trust Fund of the Florida Forest Service.
748 Section 8. Paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section
749 287.1351, Florida Statutes, is amended, and subsection (3) of
750 that section is republished, to read:
Page 30 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
751 287.1351 Suspended vendors; state contracts.—
752 (2)(a) A vendor that is in default on any contract with an
753 agency, has failed to timely compensate its subcontractors or
754 suppliers, or has otherwise repeatedly demonstrated a recent
755 inability to fulfill the terms and conditions of previous state
756 contracts or to adequately perform its duties under those
757 contracts may not submit a bid, proposal, or reply to an agency
758 or enter into or renew a contract to provide any goods or
759 services to an agency after its placement, pursuant to this
760 section, on the suspended vendor list.
761 (3) An agency shall notify the department of any vendor
762 that has met the grounds for suspension described in paragraph
763 (2)(a). The agency must provide documentation to the department
764 evidencing the vendor's default or other grounds for suspension.
765 The department shall review the documentation provided and
766 determine whether good cause exists to remove the vendor from
767 the vendor list and to place it on the suspended vendor list. If
768 good cause exists, the department must notify the vendor in
769 writing of its intent to remove the vendor from the vendor list
770 and of the vendor's right to an administrative hearing and the
771 applicable procedures and time requirements for any such
772 hearing. If the vendor does not request an administrative
773 hearing, the department must enter a final order removing the
774 vendor from the vendor list. A vendor may not be removed from
775 the vendor list without receiving an individual notice of intent
Page 31 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
776 from the department.
777 Section 9. Paragraph (c) is added to subsection (4) of
778 section 322.12, Florida Statutes, to read:
779 322.12 Examination of applicants.—
780 (4) The examination for an applicant for a commercial
781 driver license shall include a test of the applicant's eyesight
782 given by a driver license examiner designated by the department
783 or by a licensed ophthalmologist, optometrist, or physician and
784 a test of the applicant's hearing given by a driver license
785 examiner or a licensed physician. The examination shall also
786 include a test of the applicant's ability to read and understand
787 highway signs regulating, warning, and directing traffic; his or
788 her knowledge of the traffic laws of this state pertaining to
789 the class of motor vehicle which he or she is applying to be
790 licensed to operate, including laws regulating driving under the
791 influence of alcohol or controlled substances, driving with an
792 unlawful blood-alcohol level, and driving while intoxicated; his
793 or her knowledge of the effects of alcohol and controlled
794 substances and the dangers of driving a motor vehicle after
795 having consumed alcohol or controlled substances; and his or her
796 knowledge of any special skills, requirements, or precautions
797 necessary for the safe operation of the class of vehicle which
798 he or she is applying to be licensed to operate. In addition,
799 the examination shall include an actual demonstration of the
800 applicant's ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control
Page 32 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
801 in the safe operation of a motor vehicle or combination of
802 vehicles of the type covered by the license classification which
803 the applicant is seeking, including an examination of the
804 applicant's ability to perform an inspection of his or her
805 vehicle.
806 (c) An applicant for a commercial driver license who
807 receives unauthorized assistance from another person in
808 completing the portion of the examination which tests the
809 applicant's ability to read and understand highway signs
810 regulating, warning, and directing traffic or his or her
811 knowledge of the traffic laws of this state pertaining to the
812 class of motor vehicle for which he or she is applying to be
813 licensed to operate, including laws regulating driving under the
814 influence of alcohol or controlled substances, driving with an
815 unlawful blood-alcohol level, and driving while intoxicated,
816 commits a misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as
817 provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083.
818 Section 10. Section 322.36, Florida Statutes, is amended
819 to read:
820 322.36 Permitting unauthorized operator to drive.—
821 (1) A person may not authorize or knowingly permit a motor
822 vehicle owned by him or her or under his or her dominion or
823 control to be operated upon any highway or public street except
824 by a person who is duly authorized to operate a motor vehicle
825 under this chapter.
Page 33 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
826 (2) A person may not knowingly or willfully provide
827 unauthorized assistance to an applicant for the examination
828 required to hold a commercial driver license pursuant to s.
829 322.12(4).
830 (3) A Any person who violates this section commits a
831 misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as provided in s.
832 775.082 or s. 775.083. If a person violates this section by
833 knowingly loaning a vehicle to a person whose driver license is
834 suspended and if that vehicle is involved in an accident
835 resulting in bodily injury or death, the driver license of the
836 person violating this section must shall be suspended for 1
837 year.
838 Section 11. Section 377.71, Florida Statutes, is repealed.
839 Section 12. Section 377.711, Florida Statutes, is
840 repealed.
841 Section 13. Section 377.712, Florida Statutes, is
842 repealed.
843 Section 14. Present paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection
844 (3) of section 403.0855, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as
845 paragraphs (b) and (c), respectively, a new paragraph (a) is
846 added to that subsection, and subsections (2) and (4) of that
847 section are amended, to read:
848 403.0855 Biosolids management.—
849 (2) The department shall adopt rules for biosolids
850 management. Rules adopted by the department pursuant to this
Page 34 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
851 section may not take effect until ratified by the Legislature.
852 (3) For a new land application site permit or a permit
853 renewal issued after July 1, 2020, the permittee of a biosolids
854 land application site shall:
855 (a) Ensure that only Class AA biosolids are applied to the
856 soil.
857 (4)(a) All permits shall comply with the requirements of
858 paragraph (3)(a) subsection (3) by July 1, 2028 2022.
859 (b) Local governments that do not transport biosolids for
860 land application outside of their respective county boundaries
861 shall comply with the requirements of paragraph (3)(a) by July
862 1, 2031. This paragraph may not be construed to prohibit the
863 transportation of Class B biosolids by a local government
864 outside of its boundaries to a Class AA biosolids treatment
865 facility or waste-to-energy facility located within the
866 boundaries of another local government.
867 Section 15. Present subsection (5) of section 482.071,
868 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (6), and a new
869 subsection (5) is added to that section, to read:
870 482.071 Licenses.—
871 (5) Each person applying for a pest control business
872 license or renewal thereof who will offer and perform
873 fumigations as a part of his or her regular business operations
874 must furnish to the department a certificate of insurance that
875 meets the requirement for minimum financial responsibility for
Page 35 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
876 bodily injury and property damage, consisting of:
877 (a) Bodily injury coverage of $1 million per person and $2
878 million per occurrence; and property damage coverage of $1
879 million per occurrence and $2 million in the aggregate; or
880 (b) Combined single-limit coverage of $2 million in the
881 aggregate.
882 Section 16. Subsection (7) of section 482.161, Florida
883 Statutes, is amended to read:
884 482.161 Disciplinary grounds and actions; reinstatement.—
885 (7) The department, pursuant to chapter 120, in addition
886 to or in lieu of any other remedy provided by state or local
887 law, may impose an administrative fine in the Class III II
888 category pursuant to s. 570.971 for a violation of this chapter
889 or of the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter. In determining
890 the amount of fine to be levied for a violation, the following
891 factors shall be considered:
892 (a) The severity of the violation, including the
893 probability that the death, or serious harm to the health or
894 safety, of any person will result or has resulted; the severity
895 of the actual or potential harm; and the extent to which this
896 chapter or the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter were
897 violated;
898 (b) Any actions taken by the licensee or certified
899 operator in charge, or limited certificateholder, to correct the
900 violation or to remedy complaints;
Page 36 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
901 (c) Any previous violations of this chapter or of the
902 rules adopted pursuant to this chapter; and
903 (d) The cost to the department of investigating the
904 violation.
905 Section 17. Subsections (3) and (5) of section 482.165,
906 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
907 482.165 Unlicensed practice of pest control; cease and
908 desist order; injunction; civil suit and penalty.—
909 (3) In addition to or in lieu of any remedy provided under
910 subsection (2), the department may institute a civil suit in
911 circuit court to recover a civil penalty for any violation for
912 which the department may issue a notice to cease and desist
913 under subsection (2). The civil penalty shall be in the Class
914 III II category pursuant to s. 570.971 for each offense. The
915 court may also award to the prevailing party court costs and
916 reasonable attorney fees.
917 (5) In addition to or in lieu of any remedy provided under
918 subsections (2) and (3), the department may, even in the case of
919 a first offense, impose a fine not less than twice the cost of a
920 pest control business license, but not more than a fine in the
921 Class III II category pursuant to s. 570.971, upon a
922 determination by the department that a person is in violation of
923 subsection (1). For the purposes of this subsection, the lapse
924 of a previously issued license for a period of less than 1 year
925 is not considered a violation.
Page 37 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
926 Section 18. Subsections (20) and (21) are added to section
927 489.105, Florida Statutes, to read:
928 489.105 Definitions.—As used in this part:
929 (20) "Subcontractor" has the same meaning as in s.
930 558.002.
931 (21) "Supplier" has the same meaning as in s. 558.002.
932 Section 19. Section 489.1295, Florida Statutes, is created
933 to read:
934 489.1295 Prohibition against nonpayment.—
935 (1) A licensed contractor must compensate a subcontractor
936 or supplier, unless there is a bona fide dispute regarding the
937 amount due, if any, for services, labor, or materials:
938 (a) Within 45 days after receiving payment for the
939 services performed or materials supplied by the subcontractor or
940 supplier; or
941 (b) In accordance with the terms of the contract for such
942 services, labor, or materials.
943 (2) A licensed contractor who knowingly or willfully
944 violates this section is subject to disciplinary proceedings as
945 provided in s. 489.129.
946 Section 20. Subsection (6) of section 500.04, Florida
947 Statutes, is amended to read:
948 500.04 Prohibited acts.—The following acts and the causing
949 thereof within the state are prohibited:
950 (6) The obstruction of or refusal to permit entry or
Page 38 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
951 inspection, or to permit the taking of a sample, as authorized
952 by s. 500.147.
953 Section 21. Section 500.81, Florida Statutes, is repealed.
954 Section 22. Subsection (5) of section 500.93, Florida
955 Statutes, is amended to read:
956 500.93 Mislabeling of plant-based products as milk, meat,
957 or poultry.—
958 (5) The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services
959 shall notify the Division of Law Revision upon the enactment
960 into law by any 11 of the group of 14 states composed of
961 Alabama, Arkansas, Florida, Georgia, Kentucky, Louisiana,
962 Maryland, Mississippi, Oklahoma, South Carolina, Tennessee,
963 Texas, Virginia, and West Virginia of the mandatory labeling
964 requirements pursuant to paragraphs (2)(a), (3)(a), and (4)(a)
965 subsections (2) and (3).
966 Section 23. Section 501.013, Florida Statutes, is amended
967 to read:
968 501.013 Health studios; exemptions.—
969 (1) The following businesses or activities may be declared
970 exempt from the provisions of ss. 501.012-501.019 upon the
971 filing of an affidavit with the department establishing that the
972 stated qualifications are met:
973 (a)(1) A bona fide nonprofit organization which has been
974 granted tax-exempt status by the Internal Revenue Service.
975 (b)(2) A gymnastics school which engages only in
Page 39 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
976 instruction and training and in which exercise is only
977 incidental to such instruction and training.
978 (c)(3) A golf, tennis, or racquetball club in which sports
979 play is the only activity offered by the club. If the facility
980 offers the use of physical exercise equipment, this exemption
981 shall not apply.
982 (d)(4) A program or facility which is offered and used
983 solely for the purpose of dance, aerobic exercise, or martial
984 arts, and which utilizes no physical exercise equipment.
985 (e)(5) A country club that has as its primary function the
986 provision of a social life and recreational amenities to its
987 members, and for which a program of physical exercise is merely
988 incidental to membership. As used in this paragraph subsection,
989 the term "country club" means a facility that offers its members
990 a variety of services that may include, but need not be limited
991 to, social activities; dining, banquet, catering, and lounge
992 facilities; swimming; yachting; golf; tennis; card games such as
993 bridge and canasta; and special programs for members' children.
994 Upon the filing of an affidavit with the department establishing
995 that the stated qualifications of this paragraph subsection were
996 met before July 1, 1997, this paragraph subsection will apply
997 retroactively to the date that the country club met these
998 qualifications.
999 (f)(6) A program or facility that is offered by an
1000 organization for the exclusive use of its employees and their
Page 40 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1001 family members.
1002 (2) In addition to the businesses and activities listed in
1003 subsection (1), the department may exempt any other business or
1004 activity not in existence as of July 1, 2026, from ss. 501.012-
1005 501.019.
1006 Section 24. Section 501.062, Florida Statutes, is created
1007 to read:
1008 501.062 Unauthorized commercial solicitation; legislative
1009 intent; definitions; prohibited acts; penalties.—
1010 (1) LEGISLATIVE INTENT.—It is the intent of the
1011 Legislature to protect, preserve, and promote the safety,
1012 welfare, and peace of the citizens of this state by adopting
1013 measures to reduce the threat to private property rights,
1014 including the right to exclude and to be free from trespass of
1015 unauthorized commercial solicitation on private property when
1016 noticed by the property owner. It is the intent of this section
1017 to protect such private property rights by creating a uniform
1018 standard for notifying individuals or groups of individuals that
1019 commercial solicitation is prohibited on private property.
1020 (2) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section, the term:
1021 (a) "Commercial solicitation" means the act of attempting
1022 to sell goods or services, or to raise funds for a commercial
1023 purpose, through direct or indirect contact with individuals,
1024 including, but not limited to, using words, body gestures, or
1025 signs, on behalf of a business or commercial entity.
Page 41 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1026 (b) "Dwelling" has the same meaning as in s. 810.011(2).
1027 (3) PROHIBITED ACTS.—A person may not engage in commercial
1028 solicitation on any dwelling that clearly and prominently
1029 displays a sign that is no less than 8.5 by 11 inches, is
1030 visible to any person approaching the dwelling, and clearly
1031 displays a statement which identifies the dwelling as private
1032 property on which commercial solicitation is prohibited, in
1033 substantially the following manner with letters at least 1 inch
1034 in height:
1035
1036 THIS DWELLING IS DESIGNATED PRIVATE PROPERTY. NO
1037 COMMERCIAL SOLICITATION IS PERMITTED PURSUANT TO
1038 SECTION 501.062, FLORIDA STATUTES.
1039
1040 (4) PENALTIES.—A person who violates subsection (3)
1041 commits a noncriminal violation, punishable as provided in s.
1042 775.083. A person who commits a second or subsequent violation
1043 commits a misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as
1044 provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083.
1045 Section 25. Subsection (50) is added to section 570.07,
1046 Florida Statutes, to read:
1047 570.07 Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services;
1048 functions, powers, and duties.—The department shall have and
1049 exercise the following functions, powers, and duties:
1050 (50) Notwithstanding s. 20.04(7), to reorganize
Page 42 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1051 departmental units upon the approval of the commissioner.
1052 Section 26. Paragraph (c) is added to subsection (3) of
1053 section 570.822, Florida Statutes, to read:
1054 570.822 Agriculture and Aquaculture Producers Emergency
1055 Recovery Loan Program.—
1056 (3) ELIGIBLE APPLICANTS.—To be eligible for the program,
1057 an applicant must:
1058 (c) Be a United States citizen and a legal resident of
1059 this state before or on the date of the declared emergency. If
1060 the applicant is an entity as defined in s. 605.0102, the entity
1061 must be wholly owned and operated in the United States and
1062 possess an active certificate of status issued by the Department
1063 of State pursuant to chapter 605.
1064 Section 27. Section 570.832, Florida Statutes, is created
1065 to read:
1066 570.832 Florida Native Seed Research and Marketing
1067 Program.—The Florida Wildflower Foundation, Inc., in
1068 coordination with the department, shall, subject to
1069 appropriation, establish the Florida Native Seed Research and
1070 Marketing Program to conduct research designed to expand the
1071 availability and uses of native seeds and strengthen the market
1072 position of this state's native seed industry through marketing
1073 campaigns and promotions in this state and across the nation.
1074 Section 28. Section 570.846, Florida Statutes, is created
1075 to read:
Page 43 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1076 570.846 Florida Food Animal and Equine Veterinary Medicine
1077 Loan Repayment Program.—
1078 (1) PURPOSE.—To encourage specialized and qualified
1079 veterinary professionals to practice in this state, to retain
1080 the employment of such professionals in this state, and to
1081 promote the care and treatment of food animals and equine
1082 animals, there is established the Florida Food Animal and Equine
1083 Veterinary Medicine Loan Repayment Program. The purpose of the
1084 program is to authorize the department to make payments that
1085 offset loans incurred, for up to three new eligible candidates
1086 annually, for studies leading to a veterinary degree with a
1087 specialization in food animal or equine veterinary medicine.
1088 (2) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section, the term:
1089 (a) "Equine" means a species of animal belonging to the
1090 taxonomic family equidae, which includes horses and donkeys.
1091 (b) "Food animal" means a species of animal raised for the
1092 human food supply. Food animals include cattle, swine, sheep,
1093 goat, poultry, aquaculture, and apiary species.
1094 (c) "Food animal and equine animal veterinary medicine"
1095 means a veterinary medical practice that encompasses medical
1096 care, disease prevention, and consultation on the feeding,
1097 housing, and overall flock, herd, or equine health management.
1098 (d) "Food animal or equine veterinarian" means a
1099 veterinarian working in food and equine animal veterinary
1100 medicine who focuses on the management and health of such
Page 44 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1101 animals and who spends a minimum of 20 hours per week on food
1102 animal species or equine animal species care and treatment.
1103 (3) ELIGIBILITY.—To be eligible for the program, a
1104 candidate must have graduated from an American Veterinary
1105 Medical Association-accredited college of veterinary medicine,
1106 have received a Florida veterinary medical license, have
1107 obtained a Category II Accreditation from the United States
1108 Department of Agriculture, and be a practicing food animal or
1109 equine animal veterinarian in this state.
1110 (4) FUNDING.—Subject to legislative appropriation, the
1111 department may make loan principal repayments of up to $25,000
1112 per eligible candidate per year. Loan principal repayments may
1113 be made on behalf of each eligible candidate each year for up to
1114 5 years. The department may select up to three new eligible
1115 candidates each year. All repayments are contingent upon
1116 continued proof of employment in this state as a practicing food
1117 animal or equine animal veterinarian.
1118 (5) DUPLICATION OF FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE.—An eligible
1119 candidate receiving financial assistance from the federal
1120 veterinary medicine loan repayment program as established in 7
1121 U.S.C. part 3151a is ineligible to receive financial assistance
1122 from the program under this section.
1123 (6) RULEMAKING.—The department may adopt any rule
1124 necessary for the administration of the program.
1125 Section 29. Subsection (1) of section 570.85, Florida
Page 45 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1126 Statutes, is amended to read:
1127 570.85 Agritourism.—
1128 (1) It is the intent of the Legislature to promote
1129 agritourism as a way to support bona fide agricultural
1130 production by providing a stream of revenue and by educating the
1131 general public about the agricultural industry. It is also the
1132 intent of the Legislature to eliminate duplication of regulatory
1133 authority over agritourism as expressed in this section. Except
1134 as otherwise provided for in this section, and notwithstanding
1135 any other law, a local government may not adopt or enforce a
1136 local ordinance, regulation, rule, or policy that prohibits,
1137 restricts, regulates, or otherwise limits an agritourism
1138 activity on land classified as agricultural land under s.
1139 193.461, and may not require a property owner to obtain a rural
1140 event venue permit or license. This subsection does not limit
1141 the powers and duties of a local government to address
1142 substantial offsite impacts of agritourism activities or an
1143 emergency as provided in chapter 252.
1144 Section 30. Subsection (6) is added to section 570.86,
1145 Florida Statutes, to read:
1146 570.86 Definitions.—As used in ss. 570.85-570.89, the
1147 term:
1148 (6) "Rural event venue" means a venue located on property
1149 classified as agricultural pursuant to s. 193.461 and used for
1150 special functions, such as weddings, receptions, corporate
Page 46 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1151 meetings, or similar gatherings.
1152 Section 31. Subsection (7) of section 573.112, Florida
1153 Statutes, is amended to read:
1154 573.112 Advisory council.—
1155 (7) Notwithstanding any provision of this section, the
1156 Citrus Research and Field Trial Development Foundation, Inc., a
1157 direct-support organization of the Department of Agriculture and
1158 Consumer Services University of Florida established pursuant to
1159 s. 570.691 s. 1004.28, shall serve as the advisory council for a
1160 citrus research marketing order, provide the department with
1161 advice on administering the order, and, in accordance with the
1162 order, conduct citrus research and perform other duties assigned
1163 by the department. Notwithstanding s. 570.691 s. 1004.28(3) or
1164 any provision of this section, the foundation's board of
1165 directors shall be composed of the Florida State Plant Health
1166 Inspection Service Director and, appointed by the Commissioner
1167 of Agriculture, 7 members who are 13 members, including 10
1168 citrus growers, 2 representatives of the university's Institute
1169 of Food and Agricultural Sciences, and 1 member who is a Florida
1170 citrus nursery representative. Members of the board of directors
1171 shall serve without compensation but appointed by the
1172 Commissioner of Agriculture, who are each entitled to
1173 reimbursement from the foundation for per diem and travel
1174 expenses as provided in s. 112.061.
1175 Section 32. Subsection (32) of section 581.031, Florida
Page 47 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1176 Statutes, is amended to read:
1177 581.031 Department; powers and duties.—The department has
1178 the following powers and duties:
1179 (32) To conduct or cause to be conducted research
1180 projects, including, but not limited to, citrus canker and
1181 citrus greening, which are recommended by the Citrus Research
1182 and Field Trial Development Foundation, Inc., within the limits
1183 of appropriations made specifically for such purpose.
1184 Section 33. Subsection (4) of section 583.01, Florida
1185 Statutes, is amended to read:
1186 583.01 Definitions.—For the purpose of this chapter,
1187 unless elsewhere indicated, the term:
1188 (4) "Dealer" means a person, firm, or corporation,
1189 including a producer, processor, retailer, or wholesaler, that
1190 sells, offers for sale, or holds for the purpose of sale in this
1191 state 30 dozen or more eggs or its equivalent in any one week,
1192 or more than 20,000 384 dressed birds annually in any one week.
1193 Section 34. Section 590.02, Florida Statutes, is amended
1194 to read:
1195 590.02 Florida Forest Service; powers, authority, and
1196 duties; liability; building structures; Withlacoochee and Welaka
1197 Training Centers Center.—
1198 (1) The Florida Forest Service has the following powers,
1199 authority, and duties to:
1200 (a) Enforce the provisions of this chapter;
Page 48 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1201 (b) Prevent, detect, and suppress wildfires wherever they
1202 may occur on public or private land in this state and do all
1203 things necessary in the exercise of such powers, authority, and
1204 duties;
1205 (c) Provide firefighting crews, who shall be under the
1206 control and direction of the Florida Forest Service and its
1207 designated agents;
1208 (d) Appoint center managers, forest area supervisors,
1209 forestry program administrators, a forest protection bureau
1210 chief, a forest protection assistant bureau chief, a field
1211 operations bureau chief, deputy chiefs of field operations,
1212 district managers, forest operations administrators, senior
1213 forest rangers, investigators, forest rangers, firefighter
1214 rotorcraft pilots, and other employees who may, at the Florida
1215 Forest Service's discretion, be certified as forestry
1216 firefighters pursuant to s. 633.408(8). Other law
1217 notwithstanding, center managers, district managers, forest
1218 protection assistant bureau chief, and deputy chiefs of field
1219 operations have Selected Exempt Service status in the state
1220 personnel designation;
1221 (e) Develop a training curriculum for wildland
1222 firefighters which must contain a minimum of 40 hours of
1223 structural firefighter training, a minimum of 40 hours of
1224 emergency medical training, and a minimum of 376 hours of
1225 wildfire training;
Page 49 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1226 (f) Pay the cost of the initial commercial driver license
1227 examination fee, and renewal for those employees whose position
1228 requires them to operate equipment requiring a license. This
1229 paragraph is intended to be an authorization to the department
1230 to pay such costs, not an obligation;
1231 (g) Provide fire management services and emergency
1232 response assistance and set and charge reasonable fees for
1233 performance of those services. Moneys collected from such fees
1234 shall be deposited into the Incidental Trust Fund of the Florida
1235 Forest Service;
1236 (h) Require all state, regional, and local government
1237 agencies operating aircraft in the vicinity of an ongoing
1238 wildfire to operate in compliance with the applicable state
1239 Wildfire Aviation Plan;
1240 (i) Authorize broadcast burning, prescribed burning, pile
1241 burning, and land clearing debris burning to carry out the
1242 duties of this chapter and the rules adopted thereunder; and
1243 (j) Make rules to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.
1244 (2) The Florida Forest Service's employees, and the
1245 firefighting crews under their control and direction, may enter
1246 upon any lands for the purpose of preventing, detecting, and
1247 suppressing wildfires and investigating smoke complaints or open
1248 burning not in compliance with authorization and to enforce the
1249 provisions of this chapter.
1250 (3) Employees of the Florida Forest Service and of
Page 50 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1251 federal, state, and local agencies, and all other persons and
1252 entities that are under contract or agreement with the Florida
1253 Forest Service to assist in firefighting operations as well as
1254 those entities, called upon by the Florida Forest Service to
1255 assist in firefighting may, in the performance of their duties,
1256 set counterfires, remove fences and other obstacles, dig
1257 trenches, cut firelines, use water from public and private
1258 sources, and carry on all other customary activities in the
1259 fighting of wildfires without incurring liability to any person
1260 or entity. The manner in which the Florida Forest Service
1261 monitors a smoldering wildfire or smoldering prescribed fire or
1262 fights any wildfire are planning level activities for which
1263 sovereign immunity applies and is not waived.
1264 (4)(a) The department may build structures,
1265 notwithstanding chapters 216 and 255, not to exceed a cost of
1266 $50,000 per structure from existing resources on forest lands,
1267 federal excess property, and unneeded existing structures. These
1268 structures must meet all applicable building codes.
1269 (b) Notwithstanding s. 553.80(1), the department shall
1270 exclusively enforce the Florida Building Code as it pertains to
1271 wildfire, law enforcement, and other Florida Forest Service
1272 facilities under the jurisdiction of the department.
1273 (5) The Florida Forest Service shall organize its
1274 operational units to most effectively prevent, detect, and
1275 suppress wildfires, and to that end, may employ the necessary
Page 51 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1276 personnel to manage its activities in each unit. The Florida
1277 Forest Service may construct lookout towers, roads, bridges,
1278 firelines, and other facilities and may purchase or fabricate
1279 tools, supplies, and equipment for firefighting. The Florida
1280 Forest Service may reimburse the public and private entities
1281 that it engages to assist in the suppression of wildfires for
1282 their personnel and equipment, including aircraft.
1283 (6) The Florida Forest Service shall undertake
1284 privatization alternatives for fire prevention activities
1285 including constructing fire lines and conducting prescribed
1286 burns and, where appropriate, entering into agreements or
1287 contracts with the private sector to perform such activities.
1288 (7) The Florida Forest Service may organize, staff, equip,
1289 and operate the Withlacoochee and Welaka Training Centers
1290 Center. The centers center shall serve as sites a site where
1291 fire and forest resource managers can obtain current knowledge,
1292 techniques, skills, and theory as they relate to their
1293 respective disciplines, and the centers:.
1294 (a) The center May establish cooperative efforts involving
1295 federal, state, and local entities; hire appropriate personnel;
1296 and engage others by contract or agreement with or without
1297 compensation to assist in carrying out the training and
1298 operations of the centers center.
1299 (b) The center Shall provide wildfire suppression training
1300 opportunities for rural fire departments, volunteer fire
Page 52 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1301 departments, and other local fire response units.
1302 (c) The center Shall focus on curriculum related to, but
1303 not limited to, fuel reduction, an incident management system,
1304 prescribed burning certification, multiple-use land management,
1305 water quality, forest health, environmental education, and
1306 wildfire suppression training for structural firefighters.
1307 (d) The center May assess appropriate fees for food,
1308 lodging, travel, course materials, and supplies in order to meet
1309 their its operational costs and may grant free meals, room, and
1310 scholarships to persons and other entities as determined by the
1311 Florida Forest Service, regardless of whether training occurs at
1312 the Withlacoochee Training Center or Welaka Training Center or
1313 at another location in exchange for instructional assistance.
1314 (8)(a) The Cross City Work Center shall be named the L.
1315 Earl Peterson Forestry Station. This is to honor Mr. L. Earl
1316 Peterson, Florida's sixth state forester, whose distinguished
1317 career in state government has spanned 44 years, and who is a
1318 native of Dixie County.
1319 (b) The Madison Forestry Station shall be named the Harvey
1320 Greene Sr. Forestry Station. This is to honor Mr. Harvey Greene
1321 Sr., a World War I veteran and pioneer in forestry in Madison
1322 County. In 1947, Mr. Harvey Greene Sr. offered to give the land
1323 on which the forestry station is located to the state; however,
1324 at that time, the state could not accept donations of land.
1325 Instead, Mr. Harvey Greene Sr. sold the land to the state and,
Page 53 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1326 with the proceeds of the sale, purchased forestry equipment to
1327 be used by the citizens of Madison County to plant trees and
1328 fight wildfires.
1329 (c) The Bonifay Forestry Station shall be named the John
1330 Michael Mathis Forestry Station. This is to honor the late Mr.
1331 John Michael Mathis, the Chipola Forestry Center manager whose
1332 distinguished career spanned 18 years, and who received many
1333 awards for his service, including commendation for leadership in
1334 wildfire mitigation for his service during Hurricane Michael.
1335 Mr. John Michael Mathis was a proud husband, father, forester,
1336 and friend.
1337 (9)(a) Notwithstanding ss. 273.055 and 287.16, the
1338 department may retain, transfer, warehouse, bid, destroy, scrap,
1339 or otherwise dispose of surplus equipment and vehicles that are
1340 used for wildland firefighting.
1341 (b) All money received from the disposition of state-owned
1342 equipment and vehicles that are used for wildland firefighting
1343 shall be retained by the department. Money received pursuant to
1344 this section is appropriated for and may be disbursed for the
1345 acquisition of exchange and surplus equipment used for wildland
1346 firefighting, and for all necessary operating expenditures
1347 related to such equipment, in the same fiscal year and the
1348 fiscal year following the disposition. The department shall
1349 maintain records of the accounts into which the money is
1350 deposited.
Page 54 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1351 (10)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of s. 252.38, the
1352 Florida Forest Service has exclusive authority to require and
1353 issue authorizations for broadcast burning and agricultural and
1354 silvicultural pile burning. An agency, commission, department,
1355 county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the
1356 state may not adopt or enforce laws, regulations, rules, or
1357 policies pertaining to broadcast burning or agricultural and
1358 silvicultural pile burning.
1359 (b) The Florida Forest Service may delegate to a county,
1360 municipality, or special district its authority:
1361 1. As delegated by the Department of Environmental
1362 Protection pursuant to ss. 403.061(29) and 403.081, to manage
1363 and enforce regulations pertaining to the burning of yard trash
1364 in accordance with s. 590.125(6).
1365 2. To manage the open burning of land clearing debris in
1366 accordance with s. 590.125.
1367 Section 35. Section 595.421, Florida Statutes, is created
1368 to read:
1369 595.421 Farmers Feeding Florida Program.—There is
1370 established the Farmers Feeding Florida Program to coordinate
1371 with Feeding Florida, or its successor entity, for the
1372 acquisition, transportation, and distribution of non-Emergency
1373 Food Assistance Program fresh food products for the benefit of
1374 residents who are food insecure due to a lack of local food
1375 resources, accessibility, and affordability.
Page 55 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1376 (1) In order to implement the program, Feeding Florida
1377 shall:
1378 (a) Enter into an agreement with the department to
1379 provide, at a minimum, all of the following services:
1380 1. Transportation of non-Emergency Food Assistance Program
1381 fresh food products using owned vehicles or contracted
1382 commercial vehicles.
1383 2. Coordination of the purchase and pickup of food from
1384 the purchase location and delivery to the distribution location.
1385 (b) Submit monthly reports to the department, beginning
1386 July 1, 2026, which include, at a minimum, all of the following:
1387 1. A detailed record of the amount of food purchased,
1388 measured per pound and itemized according to its commodity type.
1389 2. Food purchase locations.
1390 3. Food purchase dates.
1391 4. The date of delivery and locations to which the food
1392 was distributed.
1393 (c) Submit quarterly reports, beginning July 1, 2026, to
1394 the chairs of the legislative appropriations committees,
1395 including all of the following information:
1396 1. A detailed record of the amount of food distributed,
1397 measured per pound and itemized according to its commodity type.
1398 2. The distribution locations.
1399 3. An itemized list of the types of commodities
1400 distributed.
Page 56 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1401 (2) Foods purchased by Feeding Florida through the program
1402 are restricted to charitable purposes for hunger relief and may
1403 not reenter the wholesale, retail, or secondary market.
1404 (3) Feeding Florida may not, in implementing this section,
1405 allow a candidate for elective office to host a food
1406 distribution event during the period of time between the last
1407 day of the election qualifying period and the date of the
1408 election if the candidate is opposed for election or reelection
1409 at the time of the event. This subsection does not apply if the
1410 event is in response to a declared state of emergency.
1411 Section 36. Present paragraph (c) of subsection (7) of
1412 section 597.004, Florida Statutes, is redesignated as paragraph
1413 (d) and amended, a new paragraph (c) is added to that
1414 subsection, and paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of that section
1415 is amended, to read:
1416 597.004 Aquaculture certificate of registration.—
1417 (2) RULES.—
1418 (a) The department, in consultation with the Department of
1419 Environmental Protection, the water management districts,
1420 environmental groups, and representatives from the affected
1421 farming groups, shall adopt rules to:
1422 1. Specify the requirement of best management practices to
1423 be implemented by holders of aquaculture certificates of
1424 registration.
1425 2. Establish procedures for holders of aquaculture
Page 57 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1426 certificates of registration to submit the notice of intent to
1427 comply with best management practices.
1428 3. Establish schedules for implementation of best
1429 management practices, and of interim measures that can be taken
1430 prior to adoption of best management practices. Interim measures
1431 may include the continuation of regulatory requirements in
1432 effect on June 30, 1998.
1433 4. Establish a system to assure the implementation of best
1434 management practices, including recordkeeping requirements.
1435 5. Require any facility that cultures Micropterus
1436 salmoides floridanus to maintain stock acquisition documentation
1437 or records of genetic testing.
1438 (7) REGISTRATION AND RENEWALS.—
1439 (c) The department may not renew a certificate of
1440 registration for a facility that is not compliant with this
1441 section unless documentation of corrective action is provided
1442 with the renewal application.
1443 (d)(c) A Any person whose certificate of registration has
1444 been revoked or suspended must reapply to the department for
1445 certification. A person, a company, or an entity, or a principal
1446 of a company or an entity whose certificate of registration has
1447 been revoked, may not reapply for a period of 3 years.
1448 Section 37. Paragraph (a) of subsection (5) of section
1449 597.010, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1450 597.010 Shellfish regulation; leases.—
Page 58 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1451 (5) LEASES IN PERPETUITY; RENT.—
1452 (a) All leases issued previously under the provisions of
1453 s. 379.2525 shall be enforced under the authority of this
1454 chapter, notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, and
1455 shall continue in perpetuity under such restrictions as stated
1456 in the lease agreement. The annual rental fee charged for all
1457 leases shall consist of the minimum rate of $15 per acre, or any
1458 fraction of an acre, per year and may shall be adjusted on
1459 January 1, 1995, and every 5 years thereafter, based on the 5-
1460 year average change in the Consumer Price Index. Rent must shall
1461 be paid in advance of January 1 of each year or, in the case of
1462 a new lease, at the time of signing, regardless of who holds the
1463 lease.
1464 Section 38. Paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection (1) of
1465 section 599.012, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1466 599.012 Florida Wine Trust Fund; creation.—
1467 (1) There is established the Florida Wine Trust Fund
1468 within the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services. The
1469 department shall use the moneys deposited in the trust fund
1470 pursuant to subsection (2) to do all the following:
1471 (b) Promote wine viticulture products manufactured from
1472 products grown in the state.
1473 (c) Provide grants for wine and viticultural research.
1474 Section 39. Subsection (3) of section 601.13, Florida
1475 Statutes, is amended to read:
Page 59 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1476 601.13 Citrus research; administration by Department of
1477 Citrus; appropriation.—
1478 (3) An entity that solicits research proposals and awards
1479 funding for those proposals expending funds received from the
1480 State Treasury on citrus production research conducted pursuant
1481 to chapter 573, as recommended by the Citrus Research and Field
1482 Trial Development Foundation, Inc., or conducted through
1483 contract with the department shall deliver a report that
1484 includes all of the following information to the commission
1485 biannually and at the request of the commission:
1486 (a) Project plans selected for funding.
1487 (b) The financial status of the projects.
1488 (c) Current findings of the funded research.
1489 (d) Availability of citrus products or application of
1490 growers' practices found through funded research.
1491 (e) The status of the commercialization process of such
1492 products or practices.
1493 Section 40. Section 616.001, Florida Statutes, is amended
1494 to read:
1495 616.001 Definitions.—As used in this chapter, the term:
1496 (1) "Annual public fair" means a community, county,
1497 district, regional, or state fair that is held and conducted by
1498 a fair association and permitted by the department pursuant to
1499 s. 616.15.
1500 (2) "Authority" means the Florida State Fair Authority.
Page 60 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1501 (3) "Community fair" means an annual public fair that
1502 serves an area of less than an entire county, has exhibits that
1503 are in accordance with s. 616.17, and gives premiums or awards
1504 to exhibitors. Agricultural products shall be produced in the
1505 community the exhibit represents. The majority of the board of
1506 directors of the fair shall reside, be employed, or operate a
1507 business in the community the fair represents.
1508 (4) "Concession" means use by a fair association, or a
1509 grant, lease, or license to a third party, of a portion of the
1510 land under the ownership, custody, or control of a fair
1511 association for specific uses, or the right to enter upon the
1512 land for specific purposes, such as providing rides, games,
1513 food, beverage, merchandise for sale, exhibits, projects,
1514 activities, events, programs, or other uses authorized in this
1515 chapter.
1516 (5) "County fair" means an annual public fair that serves
1517 an entire county and provides exhibitors with premiums or awards
1518 for exhibits that are in accordance with s. 616.17. Agricultural
1519 products must be typical of those produced in the county the
1520 exhibit represents. The majority of the board of directors of
1521 the fair shall reside, be employed, or operate a business in the
1522 county that the fair association represents.
1523 (4)(6) "Department" means the Department of Agriculture
1524 and Consumer Services.
1525 (7) "District fair" means an annual public fair that
Page 61 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1526 serves at least five counties and has exhibits that meet the
1527 requirements of s. 616.17. A district fair shall pay at least
1528 $25,000 in cash premiums or awards to exhibitors. Agricultural
1529 products must be typical of those produced in the counties the
1530 exhibit represents. Livestock may originate from outside the
1531 district, but must be registered in the exhibitor's name at
1532 least 30 days before the opening day of the fair. Each county is
1533 encouraged to have proportionate exhibits, typical of its
1534 respective natural resources. Each county shall have exhibits
1535 representing basic resources in agriculture and industry.
1536 (5)(8) "Entry" means one item entered for competition or
1537 show. An entry may constitute an exhibit, depending upon the
1538 regulations stated in the premium book.
1539 (6)(9) "Exhibit" means one or more entries entered for
1540 exhibition and constituting a unit. An exhibit may consist of
1541 one or more entries, depending upon the regulations stated in
1542 the premium book. The term includes parades and displays of
1543 articles or a collection of articles, whether static,
1544 interactive, or dynamic, by a fair association or a third party
1545 contracting with a fair association, such as exhibits of
1546 animals, art, housewares, or motor vehicles.
1547 (7)(10) "Exhibitor" means an individual, a group of
1548 individuals, or a business, including a fair association or
1549 third party contracting with a fair association, which has an
1550 exhibit.
Page 62 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1551 (8)(11) "Fair association" or "association" means an
1552 association not for profit incorporated under this chapter for
1553 the purpose of conducting and operating public fairs or
1554 expositions.
1555 (9)(12) "Public fair or exposition" means a project,
1556 activity, event, or program, and use by a fair association,
1557 including, but not limited to, the annual public fair, which
1558 serves the purposes specified in s. 616.08 and benefits and
1559 develops the educational, agricultural, horticultural,
1560 livestock, charitable, historical, civic, cultural, scientific,
1561 and other resources of this state, or any county, municipality,
1562 or other community in this state.
1563 (13) "Regional fair" or "interstate fair" means an annual
1564 public fair of this state and other states in which fair
1565 exhibits meet the requirements of s. 616.17. Agricultural
1566 products must be typical of those produced in the area the
1567 exhibit represents.
1568 (10)(14) "Specialized show" means a show or an exhibition
1569 exhibiting and emphasizing livestock or poultry, or a fruit or
1570 vegetable festival, and must meet the minimum exhibit
1571 requirements specified in s. 616.17. A specialized show may
1572 qualify under one of the definitions in subsections (3), (5),
1573 (7), and (15).
1574 (11)(15) "State fair" means an annual public fair that
1575 serves the entire state. Exhibits must comply with s. 616.17,
Page 63 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1576 and cash premiums or awards may be given to exhibitors.
1577 Section 41. Section 616.01, Florida Statutes, is amended
1578 to read:
1579 616.01 Requirements for Number of persons required;
1580 requisites of proposed charter.—Twenty-five or more persons who
1581 are Residents and qualified electors of the county in which the
1582 annual public fair is to be located, who wish to form an
1583 association not for profit for the purpose of conducting and
1584 operating public fairs or expositions, may become incorporated
1585 in the following manner. The applicant must subscribers shall
1586 submit the proposed charter to the department for review and
1587 approval or denial. If the proposed charter is denied, the
1588 department must provide the applicant with a letter sent to the
1589 mailing address provided on the proposed charter and include a
1590 complete listing of all deficiencies, if any, which must be
1591 remedied before resubmittal of the proposed charter for
1592 approval. If the proposed charter is approved, the applicant
1593 must subscribers shall sign and present a notarized copy of the
1594 proposed charter to the judge of the circuit court for the
1595 county in which the principal office of the association will be
1596 located. The proposed charter must specify:
1597 (1) The name of the association and the place where the
1598 principal office is to be located. The name of the association
1599 must shall include the word, "Inc."
1600 (2) The general nature of the objectives and powers of the
Page 64 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1601 association, including a provision that the association is
1602 incorporated for the sole purpose of conducting and operating
1603 public fairs or expositions.
1604 (3) The qualifications and terms of association members
1605 and criteria for their admission and expulsion. Provision must
1606 may be made in the charter for ex officio membership.
1607 (4) The time for which the association is to exist.
1608 (5) The name and residence of each subscriber.
1609 (6) Procedures for the election of and governance by
1610 officers, who may be elected or appointed.
1611 (7) The designation of officers who will manage the
1612 affairs of the association until the first election or
1613 appointment under the charter.
1614 (8) Procedures for the adoption, amendment, or rescission
1615 of bylaws of the association.
1616 (9) The highest amount of indebtedness or liability that
1617 may be accrued by the association.
1618 (10) The name of an elected member of the board of county
1619 commissioners of the county in which the principal office of the
1620 association will be located, who will serve as an ex officio
1621 member of the board of directors of the association.
1622 (11) The official e-mail address of the association which
1623 will be used for the purpose of official communication between
1624 the association and governmental entities.
1625 (12) The language for the oath that will be taken by the
Page 65 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1626 applicant, which must include, but is not limited to, all of the
1627 following:
1628 (a) That the primary objective of the association is for
1629 public service and to hold, conduct, and promote public fairs or
1630 expositions.
1631 (b) That money and other available assets in value
1632 exceeding $5,000 have been provided for purposes designated by
1633 the association.
1634 (c) That the association will operate in good faith to
1635 carry out the purposes and objectives set forth in the charter.
1636 Section 42. Section 616.02, Florida Statutes, is amended
1637 to read:
1638 616.02 Fair associations per county Acknowledgment of
1639 charter.—
1640 (1) Beginning July 1, 2026, there may be only one
1641 incorporated fair association per county in this state,
1642 excluding the state fair, which may be incorporated and
1643 conducted in any county. The department may not approve a
1644 proposed charter incorporating a fair association within the
1645 same county in which a fair association currently exists. The
1646 department may waive this requirement at the discretion of the
1647 Commissioner of Agriculture.
1648 (2) Any fair association incorporated before July 1, 2026,
1649 may conduct public fairs or expositions and exercise the
1650 authority provided to them pursuant to this chapter The proposed
Page 66 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1651 charter of a fair association shall be acknowledged by at least
1652 three of its subscribers before an officer authorized to make
1653 acknowledgment of deeds. Subscribers shall also make and take an
1654 oath, which must be attached to the proposed charter, stating
1655 that the primary objective of the association is public service
1656 and holding, conducting, and promoting public fairs or
1657 expositions; that money and other available assets in value
1658 exceeding $5,000 have been provided for the purposes of the
1659 association; and that the association will operate in good faith
1660 to carry out the purposes and objectives set forth in its
1661 charter.
1662 Section 43. Section 616.03, Florida Statutes, is amended
1663 to read:
1664 616.03 Notice of application; Approval and record of
1665 charter.—Upon approval by the department, A notice of intention
1666 to apply to the circuit court for the charter of a fair
1667 association must specify the date that application will be made,
1668 shall be sent to the department for approval, and shall be
1669 published in a newspaper in the county where the principal
1670 office of the association will be located once each week for 4
1671 consecutive weeks. The notice must briefly summarize the charter
1672 and objectives of the proposed association. the proposed charter
1673 must shall be submitted to and approved by the board of county
1674 commissioners of the county in which the principal office of the
1675 association will be located. After approval by the department
Page 67 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1676 and the board of county commissioners, the proposed charter and
1677 proof of approval must and publication shall be submitted to the
1678 circuit judge on the date specified in the notice. If no cause
1679 is shown to the contrary and the judge finds that the proposed
1680 charter is in proper form and will serve the primary objective
1681 of public service, the judge must shall approve the charter and
1682 issue an order incorporating the applicant subscribers under the
1683 charter for the objectives and purposes specified in the
1684 charter. The charter and order of incorporation must shall be
1685 recorded in the office of the clerk of the circuit court in the
1686 county where the principal office of the association will be
1687 located and provided to the department. After the order is
1688 recorded, the applicant subscribers and any their associates are
1689 incorporated with the objectives and powers established in the
1690 charter and under the name given in the charter. During the
1691 publication period, the proposed charter shall be on file in the
1692 office of the clerk of the circuit court. This section does not
1693 preclude a fair association from also filing its duly approved
1694 charter with the Department of State pursuant to chapter 617 for
1695 notice purposes.
1696 Section 44. Subsection (2) of section 616.05, Florida
1697 Statutes, is amended to read:
1698 616.05 Amendment of charter.—A fair association may
1699 propose an amendment to its charter by resolution as provided in
1700 its charter or bylaws.
Page 68 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1701 (2) After the department approves the proposed amendment,
1702 it will be incorporated into the original charter upon:
1703 (a) Publication of notice in the same manner as provided
1704 in s. 616.03;
1705 (b) Filing the order of the circuit judge approving the
1706 amendment with the office of the clerk of the circuit court and
1707 the department; and
1708 (b)(c) Being recorded in the clerk's office.
1709
1710 If a fair association has filed its charter with the Department
1711 of State pursuant to chapter 617, a copy of any amendment to the
1712 charter must be filed with the Department of State for notice
1713 purposes.
1714 Section 45. Section 616.051, Florida Statutes, is amended
1715 to read:
1716 616.051 Dissolving a charter.—
1717 (1) A fair association may dissolve its charter by
1718 resolution as provided in its charter or bylaws. The proposal
1719 for dissolving the charter shall be submitted to the department
1720 for approval.
1721 (2) Upon approval by the department and upon presentation
1722 of sufficient evidence demonstrating and publication of notice
1723 and proof that all indebtedness has been paid and no claims are
1724 outstanding against the association, the circuit judge may, by
1725 decree, dissolve the association and order the distribution of
Page 69 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1726 its remaining assets. Such assets must be distributed, by
1727 resolution of the board of directors, to the county in which the
1728 principal office of the association is located unless otherwise
1729 specified by the deed of the property held by the association
1730 its remaining public funds to be distributed as recommended by
1731 the board of directors.
1732 Section 46. Subsection (3) of section 616.07, Florida
1733 Statutes, is amended, and subsections (1) and (2) of that
1734 section are republished, to read:
1735 616.07 Members not personally liable; property of
1736 association held in trust; exempt from taxation.—
1737 (1) A member, officer, director, or trustee of a fair
1738 association is not personally liable for any of the debts of the
1739 association, and money or property of a fair association may not
1740 be distributed as profits or dividends among its members,
1741 officers, directors, or trustees.
1742 (2) All money and property of the association, except that
1743 necessary for the payment of its just debts and liabilities, are
1744 public property, shall be administered by the association as
1745 trustee, and shall be used exclusively for the legitimate
1746 purpose of the association. So long as they are used for that
1747 purpose, all money and property of the association are exempt
1748 from all forms of taxation, including special assessments, and
1749 any projects, activities, events, programs, and uses authorized
1750 by this part serve an essential governmental purpose and,
Page 70 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1751 therefore, are not taxable and are not subject to assessments.
1752 This subsection does not apply to chapter 212.
1753 (3) Upon order of the circuit judge, any public funds or
1754 property remaining in a fair association when the association is
1755 dissolved shall be distributed by resolution of the board of
1756 directors to any county or any municipality within the county.
1757 The board may designate in the distribution resolution the
1758 public project that will benefit from the funds or the manner in
1759 which the property will be used. If property has been
1760 contributed by a municipality or county, the property shall be
1761 reconveyed to the municipality or county that gave the property
1762 to the association.
1763 Section 47. Section 616.101, Florida Statutes, is amended
1764 to read:
1765 616.101 Annual review of accounts and records; review of
1766 charter.—
1767 (1) The accounts and records of a every fair association
1768 whose annual public fair has an annual attendance of more than
1769 25,000, based upon recorded attendance from the previous year,
1770 must shall be reviewed annually by a qualified accountant
1771 licensed by the state. A fair association whose annual public
1772 fair has an annual attendance of 25,000 or fewer, based upon
1773 recorded attendance from the previous year, or a fair
1774 association that is holding an annual public fair for the first
1775 time, must submit an annual financial statement that has been
Page 71 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1776 signed by an officer of the county. The results of the reviews
1777 must shall be kept in the official records of each association,
1778 available to all directors of the association. A certified copy
1779 of the review must shall be filed with the department:
1780 (a)(1) On request by the department to certify
1781 expenditures of the premiums awarded to exhibitors of a fair or
1782 of building funds if when there is evidence of a violation of
1783 state laws; or
1784 (b)(2) When the association is applying for a fair permit.
1785 (2) A fair association shall, every 5 years beginning July
1786 1, 2026, review its charter and submit to the department a
1787 certified copy of the charter which incorporates any amendment
1788 made during the last 5 years. A designated member of the
1789 association shall attest that the charter is accurate and
1790 factual when submitting the certified copy to the department.
1791 Section 48. Section 616.15, Florida Statutes, is amended
1792 to read:
1793 616.15 Permit from Department of Agriculture and Consumer
1794 Services required.—
1795 (1) An annual public fair may not be conducted by a fair
1796 association without a permit issued by the department. The
1797 association shall present to the department an application for a
1798 permit, signed by an officer of the association, at least 90
1799 calendar days 3 months before holding the annual public fair.
1800 The application must shall be accompanied by a fee in an amount
Page 72 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1801 to be determined by the department for processing the
1802 application and making any required investigation. The
1803 application fee must be at least $183 and may not exceed $366.
1804 Fees collected under this subsection shall be deposited in the
1805 General Inspection Trust Fund of the State Treasury in a special
1806 account to be known as the "Agricultural and Livestock Fair
1807 Account." A copy of the application must be sent to each fair
1808 association located within 50 miles of the site of the proposed
1809 annual public fair at the same time the application is sent to
1810 the department. The department may issue a permit if the
1811 applicant provides:
1812 (a) The opening and closing dates of the proposed annual
1813 public fair.
1814 (b) The name and address of the owner of the central
1815 amusement attraction that will operate during the annual public
1816 fair.
1817 (c) An affidavit properly executed by the president or
1818 chief executive officer of the applicant association certifying
1819 the existence of a binding contract entered into by the
1820 association and the owner of the central amusement attraction
1821 covering the period for which the permit from the department is
1822 applied. The contract between the parties must shall be
1823 available for inspection by duly authorized agents of the
1824 department in administering this chapter.
1825 (d) A copy of the association's charter which incorporates
Page 73 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1826 all amendments made A written statement that the main purpose of
1827 the association is to conduct and operate a public fair and
1828 exposition, including the annual fair, for the benefit and
1829 development of the educational, agricultural, horticultural,
1830 livestock, charitable, historical, civic, cultural, scientific,
1831 and other resources of the geographical area the fair
1832 association represents and serves. The statement must be
1833 subscribed and acknowledged by an officer of the association
1834 before an officer authorized to take acknowledgments.
1835 (e) A premium list of the current annual public fair to be
1836 conducted and or a copy of the previous year's premium list
1837 showing all premiums and awards to be offered to exhibitors in
1838 various departments of the annual public fair, which may
1839 include, but are not limited to, art exhibition;, beef cattle;,
1840 county exhibits;, dairy cattle;, horticulture;, swine;, women's
1841 department, 4-H Club activities;, Future Farmers of America
1842 activities; Family, Career and Community Leaders of America
1843 Future Homemakers of America activities;, poultry and egg
1844 exhibits;, and community exhibits. The premium list, which may
1845 be submitted separately from the application, must be submitted
1846 at least 60 calendar days before the annual public fair begins
1847 operation.
1848 (f) A complete listing of all exhibits required pursuant
1849 to s. 616.17 Proof of liability insurance insuring the
1850 association against liability for injury to persons, in an
Page 74 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1851 amount of not less than $300,000 per occurrence.
1852 (g) A copy of the most recent review.
1853 (h) A list of all current members of the board of
1854 directors of the association and their contact information,
1855 including home address.
1856
1857 The department shall issue the permit within 10 calendar days
1858 after it receives all the information required by this
1859 subsection and the applicant qualifies pursuant to this section.
1860 (2) At least 21 calendar days before holding the annual
1861 public fair, the association shall present the department with
1862 all of the following information:
1863 (a) Proof of liability insurance insuring the association
1864 against liability for injury to persons, in an amount not less
1865 than $300,000 per occurrence.
1866 (b) A copy of the association's most recent annual
1867 financial statement pursuant to s. 616.101.
1868 (c) A list of all current members of the board of
1869 directors of the association and their contact information,
1870 including mailing addresses.
1871 (3)(2) The department shall administer and enforce the
1872 provisions of this chapter except as to the regulation of games,
1873 which shall be regulated by local law enforcement agencies. The
1874 department shall adopt rules to administer this chapter,
1875 including rules governing the form and contents of the
Page 75 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1876 application for the permit and any reports that it deems may
1877 deem necessary in enforcing the provisions of this chapter.
1878 (4)(3) Notwithstanding any fair association meeting the
1879 requirements set forth in subsection (1), the department may
1880 order a full investigation to determine if the fair association
1881 meets the requirements of this part s. 616.01, and may withhold
1882 a permit from, deny a permit to, or withdraw a permit once
1883 issued to the association. The department shall also consider
1884 whether any proposed annual public fair, as set forth in an
1885 application for a permit, will compete with another annual
1886 public fair within 50 miles of the proposed annual public fair
1887 with respect to name, dates of operation, or market. The
1888 department may deny, withhold, or withdraw a permit from a fair
1889 association if the department determines that such fair
1890 association will compete with another association. The
1891 department shall give preference to existing fair associations
1892 with established dates, locations, and names. The determination
1893 by the department is final.
1894 Section 49. Section 616.251, Florida Statutes, is amended
1895 to read:
1896 616.251 Florida State Fair Authority; creation;
1897 responsibility for staging annual state fair; exemptions.—
1898 (1) There is created and constituted the "Florida State
1899 Fair Authority," a public body corporate and politic, for the
1900 purposes and with the powers set forth in this part. Such
Page 76 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1901 instrumentality, hereinafter referred to as "the authority,"
1902 shall have perpetual succession. For the purposes of
1903 implementing the intent of this part, the authority shall be
1904 considered an instrumentality of the state, subject to the
1905 jurisdiction of the state. Any conflict with respect to that
1906 jurisdiction will be resolved by the authority and respective
1907 state agencies.
1908 (2) The authority shall operate under the supervision of
1909 the Commissioner of Agriculture, which supervision may include,
1910 but is not limited to, assisting, advising, and making
1911 recommendations regarding the financing and operation of the
1912 authority. In assisting and advising the authority, the
1913 Commissioner of Agriculture may make appropriate staff of the
1914 department available to the authority.
1915 (3) The authority is charged with the responsibility of
1916 staging an annual fair to serve the entire state. Cash premiums
1917 or awards may be given to exhibitors.
1918 (4) The authority shall be exempt from the requirements of
1919 part I of this chapter.
1920 (5)(4) The principal offices of the authority shall be in
1921 such place or places in or near the City of Tampa as the
1922 authority may from time to time designate.
1923 Section 50. Paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of section
1924 624.4032, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1925 624.4032 Nonprofit agricultural organization medical
Page 77 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1926 benefit plans.—
1927 (2) For purposes of this section, the term "nonprofit
1928 agricultural organization" means an organization that meets all
1929 of the following criteria:
1930 (b) Is exempt from federal income tax under s. 501(c)(5)
1931 s. 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.
1932 Section 51. Subsection (1) of section 843.085, Florida
1933 Statutes, is amended, and subsection (5) of that section is
1934 republished, to read:
1935 843.085 Unlawful use of badges or other indicia of
1936 authority.—
1937 (1) It is unlawful for any person, unless appointed by the
1938 Governor pursuant to chapter 354, authorized by the appropriate
1939 agency, or displayed in a closed or mounted case as a collection
1940 or exhibit, to wear or display any authorized indicia of
1941 authority, including any badge, insignia, emblem, identification
1942 card, or uniform, or any colorable imitation thereof, of any
1943 federal, state, county, or municipal law enforcement agency, or
1944 other criminal justice agency as defined in s. 943.045, with the
1945 intent to mislead or cause another person to believe that he or
1946 she is a member of that agency or is authorized to display or
1947 wear such item, or to wear or display any item that displays in
1948 any manner or combination the word or words "police,"
1949 "patrolman," "patrolwoman," "agent," "sheriff," "deputy,"
1950 "trooper," "highway patrol," "commission officer," "Wildlife
Page 78 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1951 Officer," "Department of Environmental Protection officer,"
1952 "Marine Patrol Officer," "state attorney," "public defender,"
1953 "marshal," "constable," "bailiff," or "fire department,"
1954 "concealed weapon permit," or "concealed weapon permitholder,"
1955 with the intent to mislead or cause another person to believe
1956 that he or she is a member of that agency, if applicable, or is
1957 authorized to wear or display such item.
1958 (5) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor of the
1959 first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s.
1960 775.083. This section is cumulative to any law now in force in
1961 the state.
1962 Section 52. Subsection (27) is added to section 934.02,
1963 Florida Statutes, to read:
1964 934.02 Definitions.—As used in this chapter:
1965 (27) "Signal jamming device" means a device or process,
1966 such as a phone jammer, global positioning systems blocker, or
1967 other similar device designed to intentionally block, jam, or
1968 interfere with radio communications, such as cellular and
1969 personal communication services, police radar, or global
1970 positioning systems.
1971 Section 53. Section 934.51, Florida Statutes, is created
1972 to read:
1973 934.51 Possession, use, and sale of signal jamming device;
1974 prohibition; exceptions; penalties.—
1975 (1) PROHIBITION.—It is unlawful to possess, manufacture,
Page 79 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
1976 hold or offer for sale, sell, import, distribute, or use a
1977 signal jamming device in this state.
1978 (2) EXCEPTIONS.—This section does not apply to a federal
1979 or military law enforcement agency that lawfully installs,
1980 places, or uses a signal jamming device as part of a criminal
1981 investigation, or to any person duly authorized by the Federal
1982 Communications Commission.
1983 (3) PENALTIES.—A person who violates this section commits
1984 a misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as provided in s.
1985 775.082 or s. 775.083.
1986 Section 54. (1) The Citrus Research and Development
1987 Foundation, Inc., the nonprofit corporation established in s.
1988 573.112(7), Florida Statutes, is merged into the Citrus Research
1989 and Field Trial Foundation, Inc.
1990 (2) The Citrus Research and Development Foundation, Inc.,
1991 must enter into a plan with the Citrus Research and Field Trial
1992 Foundation, Inc., for the merger. Such merger must be completed
1993 by October 1, 2026. The merger is subject to chapter 617,
1994 Florida Statutes, related to the merger of nonprofit
1995 corporations.
1996 (3) Any funds held in trust which were donated to or
1997 earned by the Citrus Research and Development Foundation, Inc.,
1998 shall be transferred to the Citrus Research and Field Trial
1999 Foundation, Inc., and shall be used for the original purposes of
2000 the funds.
Page 80 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
2001 (4) The transfer of any program, activity, duty, or
2002 function under this act includes the transfer of any records and
2003 unexpected balances of appropriations, allocations, or other
2004 funds related to such program, activity, duty, or function.
2005 Except as otherwise provided by law, the Citrus Research and
2006 Field Trial Foundation, Inc., shall become the custodian of any
2007 property of the Citrus Research and Development Foundation,
2008 Inc., on the date specified in the plan of merger or October 1,
2009 2026, whichever occurs first.
2010 Section 55. Paragraph (a) of subsection (4) and subsection
2011 (6) of section 288.1175, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
2012 288.1175 Agriculture education and promotion facility.—
2013 (4) The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services
2014 shall certify a facility as an agriculture education and
2015 promotion facility if the Department of Agriculture and Consumer
2016 Services determines that:
2017 (a) The applicant is a unit of local government as defined
2018 in s. 218.369, or a fair association as defined in s. 616.001(8)
2019 s. 616.001(11), which is responsible for the planning, design,
2020 permitting, construction, renovation, management, and operation
2021 of the agriculture education and promotion facility or holds
2022 title to the property on which such facility is to be developed
2023 and located.
2024 (6) Funds may not be expended to develop or subsidize
2025 privately owned facilities, except for facilities owned by fair
Page 81 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
2026 associations as defined in s. 616.001(8) s. 616.001(11).
2027 Section 56. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
2028 made by this act to section 287.1351, Florida Statutes, in a
2029 reference thereto, subsection (4) of section 287.056, Florida
2030 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
2031 287.056 Purchases from purchasing agreements and state
2032 term contracts; vendor disqualification.—
2033 (4) A firm or individual placed on the suspended vendor
2034 list pursuant to s. 287.1351 or placed on a disqualified vendor
2035 list pursuant to s. 287.133 or s. 287.134 is immediately
2036 disqualified from state term contract eligibility.
2037 Section 57. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
2038 made by this act to section 287.1351, Florida Statutes, in a
2039 reference thereto, subsection (5) of section 287.138, Florida
2040 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
2041 287.138 Contracting with entities of foreign countries of
2042 concern prohibited.—
2043 (5) The Attorney General may bring a civil action in any
2044 court of competent jurisdiction against an entity that violates
2045 this section. Violations of this section may result in:
2046 (a) A civil penalty equal to twice the amount of the
2047 contract for which the entity submitted a bid or proposal for,
2048 replied to, or entered into;
2049 (b) Ineligibility to enter into, renew, or extend any
2050 contract, including any grant agreements, with any governmental
Page 82 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
2051 entity for up to 5 years;
2052 (c) Ineligibility to receive or renew any license,
2053 certification, or credential issued by a governmental entity for
2054 up to 5 years; and
2055 (d) Placement on the suspended vendor list pursuant to s.
2056 287.1351.
2057 Section 58. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
2058 made by this act to section 500.04, Florida Statutes, in a
2059 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 500.177, Florida
2060 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
2061 500.177 Penalty for violation of s. 500.04; dissemination
2062 of false advertisement.—
2063 (1) Any person who violates any provision of s. 500.04 is
2064 guilty of a misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as
2065 provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083; but, if the violation is
2066 committed after a conviction of such person under this section
2067 has become final, such person is guilty of a misdemeanor of the
2068 first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s.
2069 775.083.
2070 Section 59. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
2071 made by this act to section 616.07, Florida Statutes, in a
2072 reference thereto, subsection (13) of section 212.08, Florida
2073 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
2074 212.08 Sales, rental, use, consumption, distribution, and
2075 storage tax; specified exemptions.—The sale at retail, the
Page 83 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
2076 rental, the use, the consumption, the distribution, and the
2077 storage to be used or consumed in this state of the following
2078 are hereby specifically exempt from the tax imposed by this
2079 chapter.
2080 (13) LIMITATIONS ON EXEMPTIONS.—No transactions shall be
2081 exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter except those
2082 expressly exempted herein. All laws granting tax exemptions, to
2083 the extent they may be inconsistent or in conflict with this
2084 chapter, including, but not limited to, the following designated
2085 laws, shall yield to and be superseded by the provisions of this
2086 subsection: ss. 125.019, 153.76, 154.2331, 159.15, 159.31,
2087 159.50, 159.708, 163.385, 163.395, 215.76, 243.33, 315.11,
2088 348.65, 348.762, 349.13, 403.1834, 616.07, and 623.09, and the
2089 following Laws of Florida, acts of the year indicated: s. 31,
2090 chapter 30843, 1955; s. 19, chapter 30845, 1955; s. 12, chapter
2091 30927, 1955; s. 8, chapter 31179, 1955; s. 15, chapter 31263,
2092 1955; s. 13, chapter 31343, 1955; s. 16, chapter 59-1653; s. 13,
2093 chapter 59-1356; s. 12, chapter 61-2261; s. 19, chapter 61-2754;
2094 s. 10, chapter 61-2686; s. 11, chapter 63-1643; s. 11, chapter
2095 65-1274; s. 16, chapter 67-1446; and s. 10, chapter 67-1681.
2096 This subsection does not supersede the authority of a local
2097 government to adopt financial and local government incentives
2098 pursuant to s. 163.2517.
2099 Section 60. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
2100 made by this act to section 616.15, Florida Statutes, in a
Page 84 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
2101 reference thereto, section 616.185, Florida Statutes, is
2102 reenacted to read:
2103 616.185 Trespass upon grounds or facilities of public
2104 fair; penalty; arrests.—
2105 (1) For the purposes of this chapter, trespass upon the
2106 grounds of the Florida State Fair Authority or any other fair
2107 association permitted under s. 616.15 means:
2108 (a) Entering and remaining upon any grounds or facilities
2109 owned, operated, or controlled by the Florida State Fair
2110 Authority or any other association permitted under s. 616.15 and
2111 committing any act that disrupts the orderly conduct of any
2112 authorized activity of the fair association in charge, or its
2113 lessees, licensees, or the general public on those grounds or
2114 facilities; or
2115 (b) Entering and remaining on those grounds or facilities
2116 after being directed not to enter or to leave them by the
2117 executive director of the authority, chief administrative
2118 officer of the fair association, or any employee or agent of the
2119 association designated by the executive director or
2120 administrator to maintain order on those grounds and facilities,
2121 after a determination by the executive director, administrator,
2122 employee, or agent that the entering or remaining on those
2123 grounds or facilities is in violation of the rules and
2124 regulations of the Florida State Fair Authority or permitted
2125 fair association or is disrupting the orderly conduct of any
Page 85 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 433 2026
2126 authorized activity of the fair association in charge, or its
2127 lessees, licensees, or the general public on those grounds or
2128 facilities.
2129 (2) Any person committing the offense of trespass upon the
2130 grounds of the Florida State Fair Authority or any other fair
2131 association permitted under s. 616.15 commits a misdemeanor of
2132 the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s.
2133 775.083.
2134 (3) A law enforcement officer may arrest any person on or
2135 off the premises, without a warrant, if the officer has probable
2136 cause for believing such person has committed the offense of
2137 trespass upon the grounds of the Florida State Fair Authority or
2138 any fair association permitted under s. 616.15. Such an arrest
2139 does not render the law enforcement officer criminally or
2140 civilly liable for false arrest, false imprisonment, or unlawful
2141 detention.
2142 Section 61. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 86 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb433-02-c2